District of Columbia statutes.
3-1321

Rules and regulations governing conduct of lottery and daily numbers games.

The Board shall adopt rules and regulations governing the conduct of lotteries and daily numbers games to insure the integrity of the conduct of lotteries and daily numbers games to protect the economic welfare and interests in fair and honest play of lotteries and daily numbers games participants. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to: Specific application requirements and the form thereof; the terms, conditions, and rules for lotteries or daily numbers games; amount of or value of prizes; and the occasions on and frequency with which lotteries and daily numbers games may be conducted. The Board shall have the authority to impose a fine of not more than $1,000 for any violation of such rules and regulations. The Board also shall have the authority to suspend licenses of any person, firm, partnership, association, organization, or corporation for a period not to exceed 60 days for violation of such rules and regulations. All fines imposed pursuant to this section shall be paid over to the Board which shall place such fines in the Fund. Any person, firm, partnership, association, organization, or corporation fined or suspended pursuant to this section shall have a right to a hearing before the Board and, in the event of its affirmation of such fine or suspension, the right to appeal such fine or suspension to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2521.